Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4202
Guardian ad litem; qualifications; rules; act as own counsel, when.

(1) A guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to the Nebraska Probate Code shall:

(a) Be an attorney in good standing admitted to the practice of law in the State of Nebraska and meet any other requirements imposed by the Supreme Court; and

(b) Before serving as a guardian ad litem, complete the training requirements for a guardian ad litem as provided under Supreme Court rule.

(2) The Supreme Court shall promulgate rules for guardians ad litem in guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective proceedings.

(3) A guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to the Nebraska Probate Code may act as his or her own counsel and as counsel for the person who is the subject of the guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective proceeding unless such person obtains his or her own counsel or there are special reasons why the guardian ad litem or the person who is the subject of the proceeding should have separate counsel. In such cases, the guardian ad litem shall have the right to counsel and shall be entitled to have the court appoint counsel for him or her without regard to his or her financial ability to retain counsel.

Laws 2016, LB934, § 15.